Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-646.01
No extension of credit; accounts and other payment methods, authorized; limitations.

(1)(a) No person or licensee, or any employee or agent thereof, accepting wagers on a lottery conducted pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act shall extend credit from the gross proceeds of a lottery to participants in the lottery for the purchase of lottery tickets. No person shall purchase or be allowed to purchase any lottery ticket or make or be allowed to make any wager pursuant to the act unless he or she pays for such ticket or wager with cash, a debit card, the cash balance of a payment application, a transfer from a deposit account at a financial institution, or an account established in the name of the player with the lottery operator and funded as provided in subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this section, cash shall mean United States currency having the same face value as the price of the ticket or wager. A credit card shall not be accepted for payment for any wager on keno.

(b) A participant shall not use a debit card to purchase more than two hundred dollars of keno wagers from a lottery operator in a single calendar day.

(2) A lottery operator may allow participants to create an account to be used for lottery play. Such accounts may only be funded with cash, a debit card, the cash balance of a payment application, or a transfer from a deposit account at a financial institution. The lottery operator may also allow a participant to deposit prize money won from the lottery and refunds from the lottery into a lottery play account. A participant shall not deposit funds into any such account from a debit card transaction if the total amount of funds from all such debit card transactions in that calendar day would exceed two hundred dollars.

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 33;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 9.